pazar.laz.lexc
LEXICON SpatialPreverb

PersonPrefix;
@U.RECIP.PRS@%<PV.recip%>:@U.RECIP.PRS@%>oǩ%{O%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>oǩ%{O%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>am%{A4%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>cel%{A5%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>ḉeǩ%{O%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>ḉeşǩa PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>dol%{O4%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>eǩ%{O3.1%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>mend%{A5%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>el%{A5%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>eşǩ%{A5%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>eǯ%{O4%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>ey%{O2.1%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>gam%{A4%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>gol%{A3%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>goy%{A3%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>ǩoǩ%{O%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>ǩoşǩ%{A3%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>mela PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>meşǩ%{A5%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>mey%{O2.1%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>mola PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>moǩ%{O%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>moǯ%{O2.1%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>moy%{O2.1%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>ex%{O2.2%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>moşǩ%{A4%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>ǩoǯ%{O2.2%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>ox%{O2.2%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>gela PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>ǩoǯa PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>d%{O4%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>d%{O5%} PersonPrefix;


%<PV.sptl%>:%>g%{O2.2%} PersonPrefix;

%<PV.sptl%>:%>m%{O2.2%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:ge PersonPrefix;

%<PV.sptl%>:%>%{E%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>c%{E%} PersonPrefix;
%<PV.sptl%>:%>%{M%}%{E%} PersonPrefix;

%<PV.sptl%>:%>dolo PersonPrefix;		!no change after mo\ va\....

LEXICON PersonPrefix

!-----SUBJ-----!
@P.S.1@%<1SBJ%>:@P.S.1@%>%{B%} Valency;
@P.S.2@%<2SBJ%>:@P.S.2@ Valency;
@P.S.3@%<3SBJ%>:@P.S.3@ Valency;		

!-----OBJ(?)-----!
@P.D-P.1@%<1OBJ%>:@P.D-P.1@%>m Valency;
@P.D-P.2@%<2OBJ%>:@P.D-P.2@%>%{G%} Valency;
@P.D-P.3@%<3OBJ%>:@P.D-P.3@ Valency;

@P.PART.PRS@ Valency;


LEXICON Valency	! i-, u-, o-, a-

@N.VAL.PRS@@N.CAUS.PRS@@N.MOOD.INVABL@@N.IMPASS.PRS@@N.ANTICAUS.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@@N.PERF.MARKER@ Verbs;	
! VAL as present, not functional yet
! CAUS requires o- vowel
! MOOD as involuntary action or ability requires a- vowel
! ANTICAUS requires i-vowel
! Present perfect requires i-/u- vowel
! Perfect marker to disable thematic suffix other than (can be deleted??)


!========LEX=VAL========!  not clear				
@N.CAUS.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@%<val%>:@N.CAUS.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@%>%{I%} Verbs;	
@N.CAUS.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@%<val%>:@N.CAUS.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@%>u Verbs;	
@N.CAUS.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@%<val%>:@N.CAUS.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@%>o Verbs;	!---checked
@N.CAUS.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@%<val%>:@N.CAUS.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@%>a Verbs;				
!========LEX=VAL========!


!========CAUS========!---checked
@P.VAL.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.CAUSVAL.MARKER@%<caus%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.CAUSVAL.MARKER@%>o Verbs; 	! N.ASP.PREPERF is required to make sure since it is o-, it cannot be a preperf construction
!========CAUS========!


!========APPLY.LOC========!---checked
@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@%<appl.loc%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@%>a Verbs;
!========APPLY.BEN-MAL========!

!========APPLY.ABL-INV========!
@P.VAL.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.MOOD.INVABL@@P.INVABL.PRS@@P.TNS.PST@%<abl.inv%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@N.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.MOOD.INVABL@@P.INVABL.PRS@@P.TNS.PST@%>a Verbs;
!========APPLY.ABL-INV========!


! Valency-increasing operations; applicativization(non-core dative marked objects), causativization(causer=ergative marked, agent) 




!========RECIP-REFL========!			
@P.VAL.PRS@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@D.D-P.@%<val%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@D.D-P.@%>%{I%} Verbs;	
@P.VAL.PRS@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@D.D-P.@%<val%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@D.D-P.@%>%{I%} Verbs;	
@P.VAL.PRS@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@D.D-P.@%<val%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@D.D-P.@%>%{I%} Verbs;

!@P.VAL.PRS@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@D.D-P.2@@D.D-P.3@%<refl%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@D.D-P.2@@D.D-P.3@%>%{I%} Verbs;	
!@P.VAL.PRS@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@D.D-P.1@@D.D-P.3@%<refl%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@D.D-P.1@@D.D-P.3@%>%{I%} Verbs;	
!@P.VAL.PRS@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@D.D-P.1@@D.D-P.2@%<refl%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@D.D-P.1@@D.D-P.2@%>%{I%} Verbs;

!========ANTI=CAUS========!---checked (IS THIS NECESSARY)
@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@N.CAUS.PRS@@P.ANTICAUS.PRS@%<val%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@N.CAUS.PRS@@P.ANTICAUS.PRS@%>%{I%} Verbs;	
!========ANTI=CAUSE========!


!========IMPR=PASS========!---checked		! intransitive with agentive subject (unergative)
@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@N.CAUS.PRS@@P.IMPASS.PRS@%<val%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@N.CAUS.PRS@@P.IMPASS.PRS@%>%{I%} Verbs;	
!========IMPR=PASS========!



!========APPL.PERF========!
!--CAUS PRESENT?--!
@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.PERF.MARKER@@D.D-P.3@@D.S.@%<appl.prf%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.PERF.MARKER@@D.D-P.3@@D.S.@%>%{I%} Verbs;
@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.PERF.MARKER@@D.D-P.2@@D.D-P.1@%<appl.prf%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@P.PERF.MARKER@@D.D-P.2@@D.D-P.1@%>u Verbs;	
!========APPL.PERF========!

!========APPL.GOAL========!---checked
@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@D.S.@@D.D-P.3@%<appl.goal%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@D.S.@@D.D-P.3@%>%{I%} Verbs;
@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@D.D-P.2@@D.D-P.1@%<appl.goal%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@D.D-P.2@@D.D-P.1@%>u Verbs;
!========APPL.GOAL========!

!========APPLY.BEN-MAL========!	---checked
@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@D.S.@@D.D-P.3@%<appl.ben-mal%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@D.S.@@D.D-P.3@%>%{I%} Verbs;
@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@D.D-P.2@@D.D-P.1@%<appl.ben-mal%>:@P.VAL.PRS@@P.ASP.PREPERF@@P.CAUS.PRS@@D.D-P.2@@D.D-P.1@%>u Verbs;
!========APPLY.BEN-MAL========!

LEXICON Augmentative

%<aug%>:%>am Causative;

LEXICON Causative

@D.IMPASS.PRS@@D.CAUSVAL.MARKER@ CausativePerfect;
@R.CAUS.PRS@@P.ARG.TRA@@P.CAUSVAL.MARKER@@D.IMPASS.PRS@%<caus.intr%>:@R.CAUS.PRS@@P.ARG.TRA@@P.CAUSVAL.MARKER@@D.IMPASS.PRS@%>in CausativePerfect;
@R.CAUS.PRS@@P.CAUSVAL.MARKER@@D.IMPASS.PRS@%<caus.tr%>:@R.CAUS.PRS@@P.CAUSVAL.MARKER@@D.IMPASS.PRS@%>ap CausativePerfect;
@R.CAUS.PRS@@P.ARG.TRA@@P.CAUSVAL.MARKER@@D.IMPASS.PRS@%<caus.doub%>:@R.CAUS.PRS@@P.ARG.TRA@@P.CAUSVAL.MARKER@@D.IMPASS.PRS@%>in%>ap CausativePerfect;

!========IMPERSONAL=PASSIVE========!
@R.IMPASS.PRS@@D.CAUSVAL.MARKER@%<caus%>:@R.IMPASS.PRS@@D.CAUSVAL.MARKER@%>in CausativePerfect;
!========IMPERSONAL=PASSIVE========!



LEXICON CausativePerfect

@D.PERF.MARKER@ Thematic;
@R.ASP.PREPERF@@P.PERFSUF.MARKER@@P.PERF.MARKER@%<caus.perf%>:@R.ASP.PREPERF@@P.PERFSUF.MARKER@@P.PERF.MARKER@%>ap Thematic;

LEXICON Verbs
abğ%<verb%>:%>abğ Causative;
agub%<verb%>:%>agub Causative;
ak%{V%}%<verb%>:%>ak%{V%} Causative;
andag%<verb%>:%>andag Causative;
ançx%<verb%>:%>ançx Causative;
aǩ%<verb%>:%>aǩ Causative;
aǩoť%<verb%>:%>aǩoť Causative;
arğan%<verb%>:%>arğan Causative;
at%<verb%>:%>at Causative;
aťoç%<verb%>:%>aťoç Causative;
aʒon%<verb%>:%>aʒon Causative;
aǯǩomil%<verb%>:%>aǯǩomil Causative;
axvať%<verb%>:%>axvať Causative;
aḉinax%<verb%>:%>aḉinax Causative;
ağ%<verb%>:%>ağ Causative;
aşǩor%<verb%>:%>aşǩor Causative;
baniǩ%<verb%>:%>baniǩ Causative;
bax%<verb%>:%>bax Causative;
ber%<verb%>:%>ber Causative;
big%<verb%>:%>big Causative;
bog%<verb%>:%>bog Causative;
braniǩ%<verb%>:%>braniǩ Causative;
bunbul%<verb%>:%>bunbul Causative;
buʒx%<verb%>:%>buʒx Causative;
c%<verb%>:%>c Causative;
cer%<verb%>:%>cer Causative;
cicil%<verb%>:%>cicil Causative;
cun%<verb%>:%>cun Causative;
cğimoş%<verb%>:%>cğimoş Causative;
daž%<verb%>:%>daž Causative;
do%<verb%>:%>do Causative;
erǩeť%<verb%>:%>erǩeť Causative;
fiǩir%<verb%>:%>fiǩir Causative;
fťil%<verb%>:%>fťil Causative;
gijodg%<verb%>:%>gijodg Causative;
go%<verb%>:%>go Causative;
gurgul%<verb%>:%>gurgul Causative;
h%<verb%>:%>h Causative;
imbr%<verb%>:%>imbr Causative;
iskan%<verb%>:%>iskan Causative;
j%<verb%>:%>j Causative;
jil%<verb%>:%>jil Causative;
jol%<verb%>:%>jol Causative;
joť%<verb%>:%>joť Causative;
joḉǩir%<verb%>:%>joḉǩir Causative;
kandar%<verb%>:%>kandar Causative;
kat%<verb%>:%>kat Causative;
klesť%<verb%>:%>klesť Causative;
kot%<verb%>:%>kot Causative;
kukud%<verb%>:%>kukud Causative;
kyabur%<verb%>:%>kyabur Causative;
lafron%<verb%>:%>lafron Causative;
lamḉ%<verb%>:%>lamḉ Causative;
lasir%<verb%>:%>lasir Causative;
lims%<verb%>:%>lims Causative;
l%{V%}%<verb%>:%>l%{V%} Causative;
mbr%<verb%>:%>mbr Causative;
mgut%<verb%>:%>mgut Causative;
monǩan%<verb%>:%>monǩan Causative;
mpun%<verb%>:%>mpun Causative;
msǩul%<verb%>:%>msǩul Causative;
mʒikan%<verb%>:%>mʒikan Causative;
mǯǩir%<verb%>:%>mǯǩir Causative;
murg%<verb%>:%>murg Causative;
mx%{V%}%<verb%>:%>mx%{V%} Causative;
mḉoxan%<verb%>:%>mḉoxan Causative;
mçver%<verb%>:%>mçver Causative;
mşǩ%{V%}%<verb%>:%>mşǩ%{V%} Causative;
ncul%<verb%>:%>ncul Causative;
ndg%<verb%>:%>ndg Causative;
nglax%<verb%>:%>nglax Causative;
nkt%<verb%>:%>nkt Causative;
noğ%<verb%>:%>noğ Causative;
nt%<verb%>:%>nt Causative;
nťroʒ%<verb%>:%>nťroʒ Causative;
nʒxod%<verb%>:%>nʒxod Causative;
nǯi%<verb%>:%>nǯi Causative;
nzgip%<verb%>:%>nzgip Causative;
nçarǩ%<verb%>:%>nçarǩ Causative;
ob%<verb%>:%>ob Causative;
okçan%<verb%>:%>okçan Causative;
ont%<verb%>:%>ont Causative;
oǩlim%<verb%>:%>oǩlim Causative;
otas%<verb%>:%>otas Causative;
oǯǩomil%<verb%>:%>oǯǩomil Causative;
oçit%<verb%>:%>oçit Causative;
panǯ%<verb%>:%>panǯ Causative;
peleǩ%<verb%>:%>peleǩ Causative;
ṕard%<verb%>:%>ṕard Causative;
ṕinťol%<verb%>:%>ṕinťol Causative;
ṕoť%<verb%>:%>ṕoť Causative;
pirpiť%<verb%>:%>pirpiť Causative;
pruc%<verb%>:%>pruc Causative;
pustol%<verb%>:%>pustol Causative;
ǩagz%<verb%>:%>ǩagz Causative;
ǩaox%<verb%>:%>ǩaox Causative;
ǩaťoç%<verb%>:%>ǩaťoç Causative;
ǩaçit%<verb%>:%>ǩaçit Causative;
ǩlex%<verb%>:%>ǩlex Causative;
ǩozd%<verb%>:%>ǩozd Causative;
ǩ%{V%}%<verb%>:%>ǩ%{V%} Causative;
raf%<verb%>:%>raf Causative;
riǩ%<verb%>:%>riǩ Causative;
rxol%<verb%>:%>rxol Causative;
ser%<verb%>:%>ser Causative;
slib%<verb%>:%>slib Causative;
sǩomb%<verb%>:%>sǩomb Causative;
sťiǩol%<verb%>:%>sťiǩol Causative;
suler%<verb%>:%>suler Causative;
ťafr%<verb%>:%>ťafr Causative;
ťax%<verb%>:%>ťax Causative;
ťolob%<verb%>:%>ťolob Causative;
ťǩ%{V%}%<verb%>:%>ťǩ%{V%} Causative;
ťumb%<verb%>:%>ťumb Causative;
ʒ%<verb%>:%>ʒ Causative;
ʒx%<verb%>:%>ʒx Causative;
txon%<verb%>:%>txon Causative;
ǯaktur%<verb%>:%>ǯaktur Causative;
ǯaǩir%<verb%>:%>ǯaǩir Causative;
ǯat%{V%}%<verb%>:%>ǯat%{V%} Causative;
ǯažg%<verb%>:%>ǯažg Causative;
ǯil%<verb%>:%>ǯil Causative;
ǯixn%<verb%>:%>ǯixn Causative;
ǯǩim%<verb%>:%>ǯǩim Causative;
ǯurǯon%<verb%>:%>ǯurǯon Causative;
uǩunǯ%<verb%>:%>uǩunǯ Causative;
vat%<verb%>:%>vat Causative;
xarc%<verb%>:%>xarc Causative;
xel%<verb%>:%>xel Causative;
xiťon%<verb%>:%>xiťon Causative;
xor%<verb%>:%>xor Causative;
xroʒk%<verb%>:%>xroʒk Causative;
xurxul%<verb%>:%>xurxul Causative;
xç%<verb%>:%>xç Causative;
zad%<verb%>:%>zad Causative;
zg%{V%}%<verb%>:%>zg%{V%} Causative;
zm%<verb%>:%>zm Causative;
ç%<verb%>:%>ç Augmentative;
çalim%<verb%>:%>çalim Causative;
ḉab%<verb%>:%>ḉab Causative;
ḉereğ%<verb%>:%>ḉereğ Causative;
ḉiḉol%<verb%>:%>ḉiḉol Causative;
ḉǩind%<verb%>:%>ḉǩind Causative;
çil%<verb%>:%>çil Causative;
çonçxel%<verb%>:%>çonçxel Causative;
çxaṕul%<verb%>:%>çxaṕul Causative;
ğar%<verb%>:%>ğar Causative;
ğirğil%<verb%>:%>ğirğil Causative;
ğrind%<verb%>:%>ğrind Causative;
ş%<verb%>:%>ş Causative;
şal%<verb%>:%>şal Causative;
şaṕ%<verb%>:%>şaṕ Causative;
şatan%<verb%>:%>şatan Causative;
şa%{V%}%<verb%>:%>şa%{V%} Causative;
şažg%<verb%>:%>şažg Causative;
şaşinax%<verb%>:%>şaşinax Causative;
şk%<verb%>:%>şk Causative;
şor%<verb%>:%>şor Causative;
şuf%<verb%>:%>şuf Causative;
braniǩ%<verb%>:%>braniǩ Causative;
lamṕ%<verb%>:%>lamṕ Causative;
ntx%<verb%>:%>ntx Causative;
ťlaṕ%<verb%>:%>ťlaṕ Causative;
xuǯol%<verb%>:%>xuǯol Causative;
şin%<verb%>:%>şin Causative;
